Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-74] Bonds; interest rate, price, and
sale. (a) The bonds shall bear interest at rates payable at times that
the corporation, with the approval of the governor, may determine except for
deeply discounted bonds that are subject to redemption or retirement at their
accreted value; provided that the discounted value of the bonds shall not
exceed ten per cent of any issue; and provided further that no bonds may be
issued without the approval of the director of finance and the governor.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the corporation, subject to the
approval of the director of finance and the governor, may issue bonds pursuant
to section 201H‑72, in which the discounted value of the bonds exceeds
ten per cent of the issue.

(b) The corporation may include the costs of
undertaking and maintaining any housing project or projects or loan program for
which the bonds are issued in determining the principal amount of bonds to be
issued. In determining the costs of undertaking and maintaining the housing
projects, the corporation may include the cost of studies and surveys;
insurance premiums; underwriting fees; financial consultant, legal, accounting,
and other services incurred; reserve account, trustee, custodian, and rating
agency fees; and interest on the bonds for a period determined by the
corporation, or the estimated expenditure of borrowed funds for any loan
program for which the bonds are issued. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next